Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.210.278

Topical sunscreen products—Sun safety guidelines.

(1) Any person, including students, parents, and school personnel, may possess topical sunscreen products to help prevent sunburn while on school property, at a school-related event or activity, or at summer camp. As excepted in RCW 28A.210.260, a sunscreen product may be possessed and applied under this section without the prescription or note of a licensed health care professional if the product is regulated by the United States food and drug administration for over-the-counter use. For student use, a sunscreen product must be supplied by a parent or guardian.

(2) Schools are encouraged to educate students about sun safety guidelines.

(3) Nothing in this section requires school personnel to assist students in applying sunscreen.

(4) As used in this section, "school" means a public school, school district, educational service district, or private school with any of grades kindergarten through twelve.

[ 2017 c 186 s 1.]

NOTES:

Application—2017 c 186: "This act does not create any civil liability on the part of the state or any state agency, officer, employee, agent, political subdivision, or school district." [ 2017 c 186 s 3.]

Short title—2017 c 186: "This act may be known and cited as the student sun safety education act." [ 2017 c 186 s 4.]

Effective date—2017 c 186: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [May 4, 2017]." [ 2017 c 186 s 5.]